Mississippi, session 2026, HB1467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created a study committee for the purpose of studying and recommending solutions regarding the efficient management and regulation of state-owned tidelands and submerged lands, the determination of rents, and rent-free uses of those lands. (2)  The study committee shall be comprised of the following nine (9) members: (a)  Two (2) members of the Senate, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (b)  Two (2) members of the House of Representatives, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House; (c)  One (1) elected municipal official representing a municipality on the coast with a population of fewer than fifteen thousand (15,000), to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (d)  One (1) elected municipal official representing a municipality on the coast with a population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or more, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (e)  One (1) private sector member representing the gaming industry in Mississippi, to be appointed by the Secretary of State; (f)  One (1) private sector member representing the small business community in Mississippi, to be appointed by the Secretary of State; and (g)  The Secretary of State or the Secretary's designee. (2)  Appointments to the study committee must be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this act.  No earlier than thirty (30) days after the period for making appointments, the Secretary of State shall convene the members of the study committee for its first meeting, at which the committee shall organize by electing from among its membership a chair, a vice chair and any other officers determined to be necessary.  At its first meeting, the committee also shall adopt rules for transacting business and keeping records at its first meeting. Notice of all meetings must be provided to the members of the study committee no later than ten (10) days before a scheduled meeting. (3)  A majority of the members of the study committee constitutes a quorum.  In the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, and in the election of a chair, vice chair and any other officers determined to be necessary, an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present is required. (4)  The Secretary of State shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the study committee to perform its duties. (5)  For attending meetings of the committee, each legislative member shall be paid from the contingent expense fund of the member's respective house per diem in the amount authorized under Section 25-3-69 and a mileage allowance and an expense allowance in the amount authorized under Section 5-1-47.  However, a per diem, mileage allowance and expense allowance may not be paid to legislative members of the committee while the Legislature is in session or without prior approval of the proper committee of the member's house when the Legislature is not in session. Nonlegislative members of the committee must be paid per diem as authorized under Section 25-3-69 and reimbursed for traveling expenses and mileage as authorized under Section 25-3-41. (6)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision of the state, shall provide, at the request of the chair of the study committee, the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the study committee to carry out its duties. (7)  The study committee shall prepare and submit a report detailing its findings and making any recommendations to the Legislature before December 1, 2026. (8)  The study committee shall be dissolved on or before January 1, 2027. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.